Utah statutes.
73-5-1.5.   Water Commissioner Fund.

(1)  There is created a private-purpose trust fund known as the "Water Commissioner Fund."

(2)  The fund consists of assessments paid to the state engineer by water users pursuant to Subsection 73-5-1(3).

(3) (a)  The fund shall earn interest.

(b)  Interest earned on fund money shall be deposited into the fund.

(4)  The state engineer shall use fund money to pay for salary and expenses of water commissioners and other expenses related to the distribution of water specified in Subsection 73-5-1(3).



Amended by Chapter 256, 2002 General Session

